Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.590

Incorporation of other judicial review provisions.

Proceedings for civil enforcement are governed by the following provisions of this chapter on judicial review, as modified where necessary to adapt them to those proceedings:

(1) RCW 34.05.510(2) (ancillary procedural matters); and

(2) RCW 34.05.566 (agency record for judicial review).

[ 1988 c 288 s 521.]